Utah statutes.
77-23-104.5.   Signs -- Prohibitions.
An enforcement officer may not display a sign that notifies motorists of an
administrative traffic checkpoint unless the checkpoint is being operated
under the authority of a magistrate as provided in Section 77-23-104.
